Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1732.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 858-625, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 858-625. Fees for the Home Inspection Licensing Act
shall not exceed the following:
Approval fees for schools, instructors,
and home inspection organizations $100.00
Approval fees for educational course
content $50.00
Application for license $30.00

Licensure for reciprocity $50.00 $80.00
Examination fee $200.00
License fee $250.00 $400.00
License renewal $150.00 $240.00
License reactivation $50.00
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 1000.5, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1000.5. A. The Construction Industries Board may
establish a system of fees by rule to be charged for the application
for licenses, for the issuance and renewal of licenses and permits,
for administration of examinations, for formal project reviews, and
dishonored checks under the Board’s authority. This provision is
subject to the following limitations:
1. No schedule of fees may be established or amended by the
Board except during such times as the Legislature is in session;
provided, the Board may establish or amend a schedule of fees at a
time when the Legislature is not in session if the fees or schedule
of fees has been specifically authorized by the Legislature pursuant
to paragraph 2 of this subsection. The Board must follow the
procedures required by Article I of the Administrative Procedures
Act for adoption of rules in establishing or amending any such
schedule of fees; and
2. The Board shall charge fees only within the following ranges
as follows, except as may be otherwise specified in this section or
another provision of law.:
For application for license not to exceed $30.00
For administration of license
examinations: not to exceed $200.00
For license or permit issuance: not to exceed $300.00
For license or permit renewal: not to exceed $200.00
ENR. S. B. NO. 1732 Page 2

For formal project review for
code conformance: not to exceed $200.00
For permit issuance for the use
of alternative materials or
methods: not to exceed $50.00
For dishonored checks: not to exceed an amount
pursuant to the
provisions of Section
1121 of Title 47 of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
3. The Board shall charge fees for a plumbing, electrical, or
mechanical license, registration, or endorsement issuance or renewal
as follows, except as may otherwise be specified in this section or
another provision of law:
Initial contractor license $480.00
Renewal contractor license $320.00
Renewal contractor license with
late fee $420.00
Initial journeyman license $80.00
Renewal journeyman license $120.00
Renewal journeyman license with
late fee $220.00
Apprentice registration $32.00
Initial alarm endorsement $120.00
Renewal alarm endorsement $40.00
4. The Board shall charge fees for home inspection industry
license issuance or renewal as follows, except as may otherwise be
specified in this section or another provision of law:
ENR. S. B. NO. 1732 Page 3

Licensure for reciprocity $80.00
License fee $400.00
Renewal fee $240.00
5. The Board shall charge a fee of Fifty-five Dollars ($55.00)
for the initial issuance or renewal of a license for building,
electrical, mechanical, plumbing, or energy code inspectors; and
6. The Board shall charge a fee of Four Hundred Eighty Dollars
($480.00) for an initial poultry house contractor license and Three
Hundred Twenty Dollars ($320.00) for a renewal poultry house
contractor license.
B. The Board shall base its schedule of fees upon the
reasonable costs of review and inspection services rendered in
connection with each license, permit, or review, but such fees shall
be within the ranges specified in paragraph 2 of subsection A of
this section, except as otherwise specified in this section or as
provided by law. The Board shall establish a system of training for
all personnel who render review and inspection services in order to
assure uniform statewide application of rules. The Board shall
include the reasonable costs associated with such training in the
fees provided for in this section.
C. The Board may exempt by rule any class of licensee or
permittee from the requirements of the fee schedule if the Board
determines that the creation of such a schedule for any such class
would create an unreasonable economic hardship.
D. All fee changes adopted by the Board shall be reviewed and
approved as provided in subsection F E of Section 308 of Title 75 of
the Oklahoma Statutes.
E. Unless otherwise provided, licenses and permits issued by
the Construction Industries Board shall be for a one-year period.
F. When, at the time of application or renewal of any license
or registration, payment is made by check for fees and the check is
not paid by the bank on which drawn for any reason, such license or
ENR. S. B. NO. 1732 Page 4

registration issued at that time shall be invalid. In all such
cases, the license or registration shall be subject to the license
or registration fees and penalties provided in subsection A of this
section or another provision of law and treated as though no attempt
to apply for or renew a license or registration had been made. The
Board may charge and collect from the licensee, registrant, or other
obligor of fees or fines, a fee for each return by a bank or other
depository institution of a dishonored check, negotiable order of
withdrawal, or share draft issued by the licensee, registrant, or
other obligor.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 1686.1, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1686.1. A. The Construction Industries Board is hereby
authorized to establish a license category for contractors who
solely perform poultry house premise wiring for environmentally
controlled poultry house systems, and the insured poultry house
wiring to connect the premise wiring, and who do not perform any
wiring for a structure or electrical facility that is not directly
involved in the operation of the environmentally controlled poultry
house wiring system. In addition to other statutory authority, the
Construction Industries Board shall have the power to exercise all
incidental powers and duties necessary to effectuate the provisions
of the poultry house contractor license, conduct investigations
involving compliance with the licensing requirements, and enforce
the licensing provisions of this section. However, the Construction
Industries Board is not authorized to conduct an electrical code
inspection of an environmentally controlled poultry house premise
wiring system for purposes of compliance with electrical code
installation standards established for the Electrical License Act or
to issue administrative citations or fines concerning electrical
code installation standards at an environmentally controlled poultry
house.
1. With a valid poultry house contractor license, no further
registration or license is required under this act the Electrical
License Act in order to solely perform poultry house wiring for
environmentally controlled poultry houses. This license allows
contracting only for wiring of environmentally controlled poultry
house systems and is not intended to disallow or exclude unlimited
electrical contractors from performing poultry house wiring work
ENR. S. B. NO. 1732 Page 5

under an unlimited electrical contractor license without a poultry
house contractor license.
2. Experience under the poultry house contractor license shall
not be considered qualifying electrical experience for purposes of
experience requirements for application of any other electrical
license category pursuant to the Electrical License Act.
3. The Board may rely upon proof of a valid construction
license or registration issued by another state to expedite the
processing of the required information for a poultry house
contractor license;, provided, the insurance and workers’
compensation requirements demonstrate compliance with the required
coverage for work performed in this state.
4. All licenses shall be nontransferable, and it shall be a
misdemeanor for any business entity holding a poultry house
contractor license under the provisions of the Electrical License
Act to loan or allow the use of such license by any other person,
firm, or corporation, except as specifically provided in the
Electrical License Act or to engage in poultry house contractor
license work without a valid license pursuant to this act the
Electrical License Act.
B. A nonrefundable fee in the amount of Three Hundred Dollars
($300.00) set forth in Section 1000.5 of this title for the annual
poultry house contractor license shall be paid at the time of
license application to the Construction Industries Board. The
annual license shall expire one (1) year from the date of issuance.
A poultry house contractor license shall be issued for one (1) year,
at which time it may be renewed upon meeting the requirements of
this section, making application, and paying the nonrefundable
license renewal fee in the amount of Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00)
set forth in Section 1000.5 of this title.
C. The Construction Industries Board shall, upon proper
application and payment of fee, license and issue a certificate of
poultry house contractor license to any person who furnishes
satisfactory proof to the Board that the applicant:
1. Is eighteen (18) years of age or over;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1732 Page 6

2. Is the party performing, overseeing, or otherwise
responsible for the poultry house contractor work performed and who
meets all requirements of this act the Electrical License Act and
resulting rules required to obtain such license; and
3. Has provided all necessary information and documentation
required under this act the Electrical License Act, the resulting
rules, and as requested by the Board.
D. The Construction Industries Board shall require the
following for a poultry house contractor license:
1. The applicant’s full legal name, physical address, mailing
address, business name, telephone number of business and applicant,
address and place of incorporation, if any, and address of legal
registered service agent in this state;
2. Proof of lawful presence in the United States for the
applicant and all employees and laborers working under the applicant
in this state who will be involved in wiring a poultry house for
environmentally controlled poultry houses;
3. A listing of the names and social security numbers of all
employees and laborers working in this state who will be involved in
wiring a poultry house for environmentally controlled poultry
houses. The social security number information shall remain with
the Board as confidential and privileged except for necessary
disclosures to state agencies to verify compliance with requirements
of this act the Electrical License Act or upon request by law
enforcement;
4. The business entity’s federal tax ID number or the
employer’s or owner’s social security number. The and the
employer’s account number assigned by the Oklahoma Employment
Security Commission. The social security number information shall
remain with the Board as confidential and privileged except for
necessary disclosures to state agencies to verify compliance with
requirements of this act the Electrical License Act or upon request
by law enforcement;
5. A letter of good standing from the Secretary of State in the
state the contractor is domiciled and other documentation of valid
ENR. S. B. NO. 1732 Page 7

license or registration from the domicile state licensing or
registration board, commission, or agency;
6. Disclosure of resident or nonresident contractor status, and
state of residence and domicile;
7. A copy of the applicant’s certificate of liability insurance
shall to be filed with the application and shall be in an amount not
less than Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00). Any
insurance company issuing a liability policy to an applicant
pursuant to the provisions of the poultry house contractor license
under this act the Electrical License Act shall be required to
notify the Construction Industries Board in the event such liability
policy is cancelled canceled for any reason or lapses for nonpayment
of premiums. All licenses granted under this act the Electrical
License Act shall be suspended on the date of the policy
cancellation. The Board must receive proof of insurance prior to
reinstating the license;
8. The applicant shall submit proof Proof of satisfactory
workers’ compensation coverage under the Administrative Workers’
Compensation Act or an affidavit of exemption or self-insurance as
authorized pursuant to the Administrative Workers’ Compensation Act;
9. Disclosure of any felony convictions; and
10. Applicants for poultry house contractor license shall
provide such additional Additional documents, statements, or other
information as may be deemed appropriate or necessary and required
by the Board.
E. The Construction Industries Board shall refuse to license
any person if the Board determines:
1. The application contains false, misleading, or incomplete
information;
2. The applicant or any member of the business entity fails or
refuses to provide any information requested by the Board;
3. The applicant fails or refuses to pay the required fees;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1732 Page 8

4. The applicant or owner or officer or managing member of the
legal entity is ineligible for license due to a suspended or revoked
license or registration in this state;
5. The nonresident applicant has a revoked or suspended
registration or license required by law for contractors in another
state; or
6. The applicant or legal entity has failed or refuses to
submit any taxes due in this state.
F. The Board shall suspend the poultry house contractor license
when the licensee fails to:
1. Maintain liability insurance coverage;
2. Maintain satisfactory workers’ compensation coverage under
the Administrative Workers’ Compensation Act or provide an affidavit
of exemption or self-insurance as authorized pursuant to the
Administrative Workers’ Compensation Act;
3. Comply with provisions of the Electrical License Act or any
rule or order issued pursuant thereto;
4. Perform normal business obligations without justifiable
cause;
5. Notify the Board of a change in name, address, legal
business entity, legal service agent, adverse finding by a licensing
entity in this state or another state or adjudication by a court of
competent jurisdiction for any act or omission that is a violation
of the Electrical License Act;
6. Maintain a registration or license as required by law in
another state while licensed in this state as a nonresident
contractor; or
7. File and pay all taxes of the contractor or legal entity
when due in this state.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective July 1, 2028.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1732 Page 9

Passed the Senate the 3rd day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 6th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1732 Page 10